Hawaii statutes.
§329-18 Schedule III. (a) The
controlled substances listed in this section are included in schedule III.

(b) Stimulants. Unless listed in another
schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any
quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central
nervous system, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever
the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within
the specific chemical designation:

(1) Those compounds, mixtures, or preparations in
dosage unit form containing any stimulant substance listed in schedule II, and
any other drug of the quantitative composition or which is the same except that
it contains a lesser quantity of controlled substances;

(2) Benzphetamine;

(3) Chlorphentermine;

(4) Clortermine;

(5) Mazindol;

(6) Phendimetrazine.

(c) Depressants. Unless listed in another
schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any
quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central
nervous system:

(1) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing
amobarbital, secobarbital, pentobarbital, or any salt thereof and one or more
other active medicinal ingredients which are not listed in any schedule;

(2) Any suppository dosage form containing
amobarbital, secobarbital, pentobarbital, or any salt of any of these drugs and
approved by the Food and Drug Administration for marketing only as a
suppository;

(3) Any substance that contains any quantity of a
derivative of barbituric acid or any salt thereof, including the substance
butalbital;

(4) Chlorhexadol;

(5) Embutramide (Tributame);

(6) Ketamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers, also known as (+ or -)-2-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-(methylamino)-cyclohexanone;

(7) Lysergic acid;

(8) Lysergic acid amide;

(9) Methyprylon;

(10) Sulfondiethylmethane;

(11) Sulfonethylmethane;

(12) Sulfonmethane;

(13) Tiletamine/Zolazepam (Telazol,
2-(ethylamino)-2-(-thienyl)-cyclohexanone, flupyrazapon) or any salts thereof;

(14) Gamma
hydroxybutyric acid and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers that are
contained in a drug product for which an application has been approved under
section 505 of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;

(15) Perampanel [2-(2-oxo-1-phenyl-5-pyridin-2-yl-l,2-dihydropyridin-3-yl)benzonitrile],
including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; and

(16) Alfaxalone
5[alpha]-pregnan-3[alpha]-ol-11,20-dione, including its salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers.

(d) Nalorphine.

(e) Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically
excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture,
or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts,
or alkaloid, in limited quantities as set forth below:

(1) Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine, or any of its
salts, per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with
an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium;

(2) Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine, or any of its
salts, per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with
one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

(3) Not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine,
or any of its salts, per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per
dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized
therapeutic amounts;

(4) Not more than 300 milligrams of ethylmorphine, or
any of its salts, per 100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage
unit, with one or more ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;

(5) Not more than 500 milligrams of opium per 100
milliliters or per 100 grams, or not more than 25 milligrams per dosage unit,
with one or more active nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic
amounts;

(6) Not more than 50 milligrams of morphine or any of
its salts, per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams with one or more active,
nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts; and

(7) Buprenorphine.

(f) The department of public safety may except
by rule any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any stimulant or
depressant substance listed in subsections (b) and (c) from the application of
all or any part of this chapter if the compound, mixture, or preparation
contains one or more active medicinal ingredients not having a stimulant or
depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the admixtures are
included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that
vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a stimulant or
depressant effect on the central nervous system.

(g) Any anabolic steroid. The term
"anabolic steroid" means any drug or hormonal substance chemically
and pharmacologically related to testosterone (other than estrogens,
progestins, and corticosteroids) that promotes muscle growth, and includes:

(1) Boldenone;

(2) Clostebol (4‑Chlorotestosterone);

(3) Dehydrochlormethyltestosterone;

(4) Dihydrotestosterone (4‑dihydrotestosterone);

(5) Drostanolone;

(6) Ethylestrenol;

(7) Fluoxymesterone;

(8) Formebolone (Formyldienolone);

(9) Mesterolone;

(10) Methandranone;

(11) Methandriol;

(12) Methandrostenolone (Methandienone);

(13) Methenolone;

(14) Methyltestosterone;

(15) Mibolerone;

(16) Nandrolone;

(17) Norethandrolone;

(18) Oxandrolone;

(19) Oxymesterone;

(20) Oxymetholone;

(21) Stanolone (Dihydrotestosterone);

(22) Stanozolol;

(23) Testolactone;

(24) Testosterone;

(25) Trenbolone;

(26) 3[beta], 17-dihydroxy-5a-androstane;

(27) 3[alpha], 17[beta]-dihydroxy-5a-androstane;

(28) 5[alpha]-androstan-3, 17-dione;

(29) 1-androstenediol (3[beta],
17[beta]-dihydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-ene);

(30) 1-androstenediol (3[alpha],
17[beta]-dihydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-ene);

(31) 4-androstenediol (3[beta],
17[beta]-dihydroxy-androst-4-ene);

(32) 5-androstenediol (3[beta],
17[beta]-dihydroxy-androst-5-ene);

(33) 1-androstenedione ([5[alpha]]-androst-1-en-3, 17‑dione);

(34) 4-androstenedione (androst-4-en-3, 17-dione);

(35) 5-androstenedione (androst-5-en-3, 17-dione);

(36) Bolasterone (7[alpha],
17[alpha]-dimethyl-17[beta]-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

(37) Calusterone (7[beta],
17[alpha]-dimethyl-17[beta]-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

(38) [Delta]1-dihydrotestosterone (a.k.a.
'1-testosterone') (17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one);

(39) Furazabol
(17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]-furazan);

(40) 13[beta]-ethyl-17[beta]-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one;

(41) 4-hydroxytestosterone
(4,17[beta]-dihydroxy-androst-4‑en-3-one);

(42) 4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone
(4,17[beta]-dihydroxy-estr-4-en-3-one);

(43) Mesterolone
(1[alpha]methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-[5[alpha]]-androstan-3-one);

(44) Methandienone
(17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one);

(45) Methandriol (17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta],
17[beta]-dihydroxyandrost-5-ene);

(46) Methenolone
(1-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxy-5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one);

(47) 17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta], 17[beta]-dihydroxy-5a‑androstane;

(48) 17[alpha]-methyl-3[alpha], 17[beta]-dihydroxy-5a‑androstane;

(49) 17[alpha]-methyl-3[beta],
17[beta]-dihydroxyandrost-4‑ene;

(50) 17[alpha]-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone
(17[alpha]-methyl-4-hydroxy-17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);

(51) Methyldienolone
(17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxyestra-4, 9(10)-dien-3-one);

(52) Methyltrienolone
(17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxyestra-4, 9-11-trien-3-one);

(53) 17[alpha]-methyl-[Delta] 1-dihydrotestosterone
(17b [beta]-hydroxy-17[alpha]-methyl-5[alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one) (a.k.a.
'17-[alpha]-methyl-1-testosterone');

(54) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3[beta],
17[beta]-dihydroxyestr-4-ene);

(55) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3[alpha],
17[beta]-dihydroxyestr-4-ene);

(56) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3[beta],
17[beta]-dihydroxyestr-5-ene);

(57) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3[alpha], 17[beta]-dihydroxyestr-5-ene);

(58) 19-nor-4-androstenedione (estr-4-en-3, 17-dione);

(59) 19-nor-5-androstenedione (estr-5-en-3, 17-dione);

(60) Norbolethone (13[beta],
17[alpha]-diethyl-17[beta]-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one);

(61) Norclostebol (4-chloro-17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3‑one);

(62) Normethandrolone
(17[alpha]-methyl-17[beta]-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);

(63) Stenbolone
(17[beta]-hydroxy-2-methyl-[5[alpha]]-androst-1-en-3-one);

(64) Tetrahydrogestrinone (13[beta],
17[alpha]-diethyl-17[beta]-hydroxygon-4, 9, 11-trien-3-one);

(65) Desoxymethyltestosterone
(17a-methyl-5a-androst-2-en-17-ol, madol);

(66) 19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione
(estra-4,9(10)-diene-3,17-dione);

(67) Boldione (Androsta-1,4-diene-3,17-dione);

(68) Methasterone (2 alpha-17 alpha-dimethyl-5 alpha-androstan-17beta-ol-3-one);

(69) Prostanozol (17 beta-hydroxy-5
alpha-androstano[3,2-c]pryazole; and

(70) Any salt, ester, or isomer of a drug or substance
described or listed in this subsection, if that salt, ester, or isomer promotes
muscle growth, except the term "anabolic steroid" does not include an
anabolic steroid that is expressly intended for administration through implants
to cattle or other nonhuman species and that has been approved by the Secretary
of Health and Human Services for nonhuman administration. If any person
prescribes, dispenses, or distributes an anabolic steroid intended for
administration to nonhuman species for human use, the person shall be
considered to have prescribed, dispensed, or distributed an anabolic steroid within
the meaning of this paragraph.

(h) Hallucinogenic substances, unless listed
in another schedule, shall include Dronabinol (synthetic), in sesame oil and
encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a United States Food and Drug
Administration approved drug product. [L 1972, c 10, pt of §1 and am c 114,
§2(1); am L 1974, c 217, §3; am L 1975, c 26, §2; am L 1977, c 116, §2; am L
1978, c 68, §4; am L 1988, c 59, §3; am L 1990, c 281, §10; am L 1991, c 159,
§8; am L 1992, c 151, §1; am L 1995, c 122, §3; am L 1997, c 356, §§3, 4; am L
2000, c 98, §4; am L 2001, c 203, §4; am L 2003, c 151, §4; am L 2004, c 193,
§2; am L 2008, c 186, §3; am L 2009, c 117, §3; am L 2011, c 73, §3; am L 2013,
c 48, §3; am L 2014, c 54, §2; am L 2015, c 195, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next